Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202531-1003
Department, defined.

Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 75;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 55.